District of Columbia statutes.
9-1111.05

Disposal of excess revenues.

To the extent that revenues or other receipts derived from or in connection with the ownership or operation of the adopted regional system (other than service payments under transit service agreements executed between the Transit Authority and local political subdivisions, the proceeds of bonds or other evidences of indebtedness issued by the Transit Authority, and capital contributions received by the Transit Authority) are excess to the amounts necessary to make all payments, including debt service, operating and maintenance expenses, and deposits in reserves required or permitted by the terms of any contract of the Transit Authority with or for the benefit of holders of its bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued for any purpose relating to the adopted regional system, other than extensions thereof, two thirds of such excess revenues shall, at the end of each fiscal year, beginning with the fiscal year in which the adopted regional system (exclusive of extensions) is first put into substantially full revenue service, be paid into the Treasury of the United States as miscellaneous receipts.

Dec. 9, 1969, 83 Stat. 322, Pub. L. 91-143, § 6

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2457.
1973 Ed., § 1-1445.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90 day) Anacostia Corridor Demonstration Project Funding provisions, see § 7002 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) Anacostia Corridor Demonstration Project Funding provisions, see § 7002 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).

Emergency Legislation

Short title of subtitle A of Law 15-205: Section 7001 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle A of the act may be cited as the Anacostia Corridor Demonstration Project Funding Act of 2004.

Short Title

Editor's Notes

Section 7002 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided: “The Council directs the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (‘WMATA’) to deposit into a separate account for the funding of the Anacostia Corridor Demonstration Project all presently undedicated funds from the following District accounts:

“(1) District of Columbia Statement of Accounts with WMATA Schedule A: Principal and Interest Statement; and

“(2) WMATA/District of Columbia Local Funding Agreement Escrow Account.”

Appropriations authorized: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2362, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided for construction projects an increase of $46,923,000 (including an increase of $34,000,000 for the highway trust fund, reallocations and rescissions for a net rescission of $120,496,000 from local funds appropriated under this heading in prior fiscal years and an additional $133,419,000 in Federal funds), as authorized by §§ 34-2405.01 through 34-2405.08; §§ 34-2413.08, 34-2413.10 and 34-2304; and §§ 10-619 and 47-3404; including acquisition of sites, preparation of plans and specifications, conducting preliminary surveys, erection of structures, including building improvement and alteration and treatment of grounds, to remain available until expended: Provided, That funds for use of each capital project implementing agency shall be managed and controlled in accordance with all procedures and limitations established under the Financial Management System: Provided further, That all funds provided by this appropriation title shall be available only for the specific projects and purposes intended: Provided further, That notwithstanding the foregoing, all authorizations for capital outlay projects, except those projects covered by the first sentence of section 23(a) of the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1968, approved August 23, 1968 (82 Stat. 827; Public Law 90-495; D.C. Code, sec. 9-107.01, note), for which funds are provided by this appropriation title, shall expire on September 30, 1998, except authorizations for projects as to which funds have been obligated in whole or in part prior to September 30, 1998: Provided further, That upon expiration of any such project authorization the funds provided herein for the project shall lapse.